California statutes. Public Resources Code
 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 239, Sec. 5.   (SB 846)   Effective September 2, 2022.   Inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

25548.3.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to make available a one billion four hundred million dollar ($1,400,000,000) loan from the General Fund to the Department of Water Resources for the purpose of being loaned to the borrower for extending operations of the Diablo Canyon powerplant facility, to dates that shall be no later than November 1, 2029, for Unit 1, and no later than November 1, 2030, for Unit 2. The Legislature intends to transfer an initial six hundred million dollars ($600,000,000) from the General Fund to the department. It is the intent of the Legislature that the remaining eight hundred million dollars ($800,000,000) shall require future legislative authorization before the transfer of funds.

(b) (1) To facilitate the extension of the operating period, the department may make a loan or loans to the borrower out of any funds that the Legislature transfers to the Diablo Canyon Extension Fund established pursuant to Section 25548.6, up to a total principal amount not to exceed one billion four hundred million dollars ($1,400,000,000). Of this amount, up to three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000) may be paid out by the department upon the execution of, and according to the terms of, loan agreements described in subdivision (c). For any additional amount beyond that three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000), but not more than a total of six hundred million dollars ($600,000,000), the department shall submit a written expenditure plan requesting the release of additional funding pursuant to this section to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. The Department of Finance may provide funds not sooner than 30 days after notifying, in writing, the
 Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or any lesser time determined by the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee.

(2) The department shall not disburse the entire loan amount in one lump sum, but shall disburse the loan amount pursuant to a loan disbursement schedule established pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(c) The department may enter into a loan agreement with the borrower. In addition to any terms and conditions determined necessary by the department, the loan agreement shall include all of the following:

(1) (A) A covenant by the borrower that it shall take all steps necessary to secure a grant or other funds available for the operation of a nuclear powerplant from the United States Department of Energy, and any other potentially available federal
 funds, to repay the loan.

(B) If the operator is not deemed eligible by the United States Department of Energy for a federal funding program by March 1, 2023, or the earliest date set by the Department of Energy for determining eligibility pursuant to the Civil Nuclear Credit Program established by Section 18753 of Title 42 of the United States Code, the operator shall return all unexpended and uncommitted loan moneys and the department shall immediately terminate the loan.

(2) An interest rate that the department may charge, set at a rate less than the Pooled Money Investment Account rate.

(3) A provision that the loan shall be provided in tranches, with any disbursements following the initial disbursement made contingent upon the semiannual true-up review pursuant to Section 25548.4, and which shall be based on
 milestones set forth in annual plans for the purpose of project costs, operations and maintenance, internal and external labor, capital improvement costs, fuel purchase, fuel storage, regulatory compliance costs, transition fees, and other expenses associated with the extension of the operating periods and current expiration dates, to cover incremental costs incurred by the borrower in its efforts to extend the operating period. Covered costs shall be limited to those necessary to preserve the option of extending the Diablo Canyon powerplant or to extend the Diablo Canyon powerplant’s operation to maintain electrical reliability.

(4) Events that would trigger loan repayment obligations by the borrower, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Failure of the borrower to submit a timely and complete application for funding from the Department of Energy for
 determining eligibility pursuant to the Civil Nuclear Credit Program established by Section 18753 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(B) Failure to disclose to the department any known safety risk, seismic risk, environmental hazard, or material defect that would disqualify the application of the borrower for grants or funds for the operation of a nuclear powerplant from a funding program of the United States Department of Energy or otherwise disallow or substantially delay any necessary permitting or approvals necessary for the extension of operating the Diablo Canyon powerplant.

(C) A change in ownership of the Diablo Canyon powerplant, as determined by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Section 851 of the Public Utilities Code, before August 26, 2025.

(5) Events that would trigger a suspension or
 early termination of the loan agreement, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) A determination by the department that the borrower has not obtained the necessary license renewal, permits, and approvals.

(B) A determination by the department that license renewal, permit, or approval conditions are too onerous, or will generate costs that exceed the maximum amount of loan authorized pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(C) A determination by the Public Utilities Commission that an extension of the Diablo Canyon powerplant is not cost effective or imprudent, or both.

(D) A determination by the commission, pursuant to Section 25233.2 and voted upon at a commission’s business meeting, that the state’s forecasts for the calendar
 years 2024 to 2030, inclusive, do not show reliability deficiencies if the Diablo Canyon powerplant is retired by 2025, or that extending the Diablo Canyon powerplant to at least 2030 is not necessary for meeting any potential supply deficiency.

(E) A unexpected early retirement of the Diablo Canyon powerplant. 

(F) A determination by the department that permitted timeframes are not viable to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(G) A determination by the department that expenses are unexpected or too large, or that repayment is less likely than initially anticipated.

(H) A final determination by the United States Department of Energy that the Diablo Canyon powerplant is not eligible for the Civil Nuclear Credit Program established by Section 18753
 of Title 42 of the United States Code. 

(6) Conditions that would result in forgiveness, in whole or in part, of the loan by the department, provided that any amount forgiven is limited to amounts already committed or incurred and that any unspent or uncommitted remainder of the loan proceeds is required to be repaid.

(7) No loan proceeds shall be treated as shareholder profits or be paid out as dividends.

(8) A provision prohibiting shareholder dividends from being deemed eligible costs under the loan.

(9) A covenant that, if the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission or any state agency requires, during the process of relicensing the Diablo Canyon powerplant, seismic safety or other safety modifications to the powerplant that would exceed the
 loan amount specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), any application or approval to extend the operation period the commission shall promptly evaluate whether the extension of the Diablo Canyon powerplant remains a cost-effective means to meet California’s mid-term reliability needs, before any subsequent authorization and appropriation by the Legislature of an amount in excess of the loan amount.

(10) A covenant that the operator shall allocate all revenues received as a result of federal or state tax credits or incentives, excluding funds specifically allocated by a federal program for the costs of extending power plant operations, on a cost-share basis of 10 and 90 percent between the operator corporation and ratepayers of a load-serving entity responsible for the costs of the continued operation, respectively.

(11) A covenant addressing circumstances in which the
 operator must indemnify the department and the state for liability associated with the Diablo Canyon powerplant.

(12) A covenant requiring the operator to comply with the conditions specified in Section 25548.7.

(13) A covenant that the operator shall conduct an updated seismic assessment.

(14) A covenant that the operator shall commission a study by independent consultants to catalog and evaluate any deferred maintenance at the Diablo Canyon powerplant and to provide recommendations as to any risk posed by the deferred maintenance, potential remedies, and cost estimates of those remedies, and a timeline for undertaking those remedies.

(15) A covenant that the operator shall report to the commission no later than March 1, 2023, on the available capacity
 of existing wet and dry spent fuel storage facilities and the forecasted amount of spent fuel that will be generated by powerplant operations through the retirement dates for both units as of August 1, 2022, and November 1, 2029, for Unit 1 and November 1, 2030, for Unit 2. 

(16) A monthly performance-based disbursement equal to seven dollars ($7) for each megawatthour generated by the Diablo Canyon powerplant during the period before the start of extended operations. The disbursement is contingent upon the operator’s ongoing pursuit of an extension of the operating period and continued safe and reliable Diablo Canyon powerplant operations.

(d) Except for this section and the loan agreement provided for under subdivision (c), notwithstanding Section 11019 of the Government Code or any other law, the department may disburse the tranches of funds specified in paragraph (3) of
 subdivision (c) to the borrower in advance of the borrower having committed to, or incurred, eligible costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 239, Sec. 5.   (SB 846)   Effective September 2, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25548.4.

(a) Within 180 days after the date of the loan agreement, the department, in collaboration with the Public Utilities Commission, shall establish a methodology and process for it to conduct a semiannual true-up review of the borrower’s use of loan proceeds.

(b) The purpose of the true-up review shall be to determine all of the following:

 (1) Whether the borrower used loan proceeds to pay only for eligible costs.

(2) Whether the eligible costs were reasonable.

(3) Whether the costs are in the public interest.

(4) Whether the Public Utilities Commission has not authorized rate recovery of the same costs.

(5) Other considerations deemed appropriate by the Public Utilities Commission.

(c) The review shall demonstrate the operator did not retain any revenues for shareholders from funds associated with the loan.

(d) If, upon completing a true-up review, the department determines that the borrower’s use of loan proceeds did not meet the requirements set forth in subdivision (b), those amounts shall be deemed disallowed costs.

(e) If the department finds disallowed costs pursuant to subdivision (c), the department shall notify the borrower of the amount of disallowed costs as promptly as possible and the
 department shall take action to recoup the disallowed costs pursuant to the loan agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 239, Sec. 5.   (SB 846)   Effective September 2, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25548.5.

(a) The department may do any of the following as may be, in the determination of the department, necessary or appropriate for purposes of this chapter:

(1) Enter into one or more agreements with the Public Utilities Commission or other state agencies to facilitate the true-up reviews required by Section 25548.4, facilitate extension of the operating period, and further the purposes of this chapter.

(2) Engage the services of private parties to render professional and technical assistance and advice and other services in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

(3) Contract for the services of other public
 agencies.

(4) Engage in activities or enter into contracts or arrangements as may be necessary or desirable to carry out the department’s duties and responsibilities pursuant to this chapter.

(5) Hire personnel necessary and desirable for the timely and successful implementation and administration of the department’s duties and responsibilities pursuant to this chapter. The State Personnel Board and the Department of Human Resources shall assist the department in expediting that hiring.

(6) Disburse funds to reimburse the department for the costs incurred in the administration of this chapter, which shall equal no more than 5 percent of the amount of funds disbursed.

(b) Contracts entered into pursuant to this chapter, amendments to those contracts
 during their terms, or contracts for services reasonably related to those contracts, shall not be subject to competitive bidding or any other state contracting requirements, shall not require the review, consent, or approval of the Department of General Services or any other state department or agency, and are not subject to the requirements of the State Contracting Manual or the Public Contract Code.

(c) Any loan agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter is not a project for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(d) The powers and responsibilities of the department established pursuant to this chapter are separate from, and not governed by, the provisions relating to the State Water Resources Development System.

(e) All state agencies and other
 state entities, and their officers and employees, shall and are hereby authorized to, at the request of the department, give the department reasonable assistance or other cooperation in carrying out the purposes of this chapter. 

(f) In accordance with the purposes of the loan and this chapter, the operator shall take all steps necessary to facilitate the extension of the operating period, including submitting applications for required federal and state agency approvals, notwithstanding Public Utilities Commission Decision 18-01-022 (January 16, 2018) Decision Approving Retirement of Diablo Canyon Nuclear Power Plant and pending further actions by the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 239, Sec. 5.   (SB 846)   Effective September 2, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25548.6.

(a) The Diablo Canyon Extension Fund is hereby established within the State Treasury. The moneys in the fund shall be available to the department for the administration and implementation of this chapter.

(b) Repayments of the loan authorized under Section 25548.3 shall be deposited into the fund and shall remain available for further disbursement subject to subdivision (a) of Section 25548.3.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department for purposes of this chapter.

(d) The fund and the moneys in the fund are separate and
 distinct from any other funds and moneys administered by the department.

(e) Upon the early termination of, or full repayment of, the loan, all moneys remaining in the Diablo Canyon Extension Fund shall be transferred to the General Fund and subdivision (a), (c), and (d) shall become inoperative. 

(f) The Department of Finance shall allocate up to six hundred million dollars ($600,000,000), pursuant to Section 25548.3, from the General Fund as loans to the Department of Water Resources for deposit into the Diablo Canyon Extension Fund. The Department of Water Resources may disburse moneys from the Diablo Canyon Extension Fund to the operator of the Diablo Canyon powerplant under a loan agreement pursuant to Section 25548.3. At the direction of the Department of Water Resources, the Controller shall draw a warrant for this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 239, Sec. 5.   (SB 846)   Effective September 2, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25548.7.

Continued operation of the Diablo Canyon powerplant as provided in this chapter is in all respects for the welfare and the benefit of the people of the state, to protect public peace, health, and safety, and constitutes an essential governmental purpose. This chapter shall be liberally construed in a manner so as to effectuate its purposes and objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 239, Sec. 5.   (SB 846)   Effective September 2, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25548.8.

(a) The department, in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission and the commission, shall provide a biannual report, on or before February 1 and August 1 of each year until December 31, 2030, to the relevant budget and policy committees of both houses of the Legislature on the status of the loan authorized pursuant to this chapter from the Diablo Canyon Extension Fund established pursuant to Section 25548.6.

(b) Each biannual report shall include, at minimum, all of the following:

(1) The amount of the loan that has been distributed to the borrower.

(2) A detailed listing of the eligible uses of the loan
 that have been allowed, and those that have been deemed disallowed, as part of the required semiannual true-up review, pursuant to Section 25548.4.

(3) The amount of the unpaid loan balance.

(4) The most recent forecast of the amounts that may be repaid from the loan.

(5) A detailed listing of efforts to secure federal funding and their status, including, if applicable, the expected date of any awards.

(6) The status of the current expected shortfall of funds that may need to be absorbed by the general fund or other sources of funding.

(c) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the
 Government Code.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2033.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 42.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5. Natural Gas Rating and Tracking [25550. - 25555.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [25550. - 25550.]

25550.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Buyer of natural gas” means a gas corporation, local publicly owned gas utility, noncore gas customer, or core transport agent.

(b) “Core transport agent” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 980 of the Public Utilities Code.

(c) “Division” means the Geologic Energy Management Division.

(d) “Gas corporation” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 222 of the Public Utilities Code.

(e) “Natural gas infrastructure” means a natural gas facility used for the production, gathering and boosting, processing, transmission, storage, or distribution necessary for the delivery of natural gas to end-use customers in California.

(f) “Noncore gas customer” means an entity that procures directly from natural gas producers or natural gas marketers and is not a gas corporation or local publicly owned gas utility.

(g) “Procure” means to acquire through ownership or contract.

(h) “Tracking” means using a system that communicates the pathway of a given volume of natural gas from its
 initial production to its delivery to end-use customers in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 771, Sec. 18.   (AB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Natural Gas Tracking System [25555. - 25555.]

25555.

The State Air Resources Board, in consultation with the commission, shall develop a model of fugitive and vented emissions of methane from natural gas infrastructure. The model shall do all of the following:

(a) Quantify emissions from specific natural gas infrastructure.

(b) Incorporate the current condition and current management practices of specific natural gas infrastructure.

(c) Incorporate natural gas industry best management practices established by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Section 975 of the Public Utilities Code for gas corporations, by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, by the division, and by other relevant
 entities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 25.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Research and Development [25600. - 25619.]

25600.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Passive thermal system” means a system which utilizes the structural elements of a building and is not augmented by mechanical components to provide for collection, storage and distribution of solar energy or coolness.

(b) “Semipassive thermal system” means a system which utilizes the structural elements of a building and is augmented by mechanical components to provide for collection, storage, and distribution of solar energy or coolness.

(c) “Solar device” means the equipment associated with the collection, transfer, distribution, storage, and control of solar energy.

(d) “Solar system” means the integrated use of solar devices for the functions of collection, transfer, storage, and distribution of solar energy.

(e) “Standard” means a specification of design, performance, and procedure, or of the instrumentation, equipment, surrounding conditions, and skills required during the conduct of a procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1081.)
-------------------------------------------

25601.

The commission shall develop and coordinate a program of research and development in energy supply, consumption, and conservation and the technology of siting facilities and shall give priority to those forms of research and development that are of particular importance to the state, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Methods of energy conservation specified in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 25400).

(b) Increased energy use efficiencies of existing thermal electric and hydroelectric powerplants and increased energy efficiencies in designs of thermal electric and hydroelectric powerplants.

(c) Expansion and accelerated development of alternative sources of energy, including geothermal and solar resources, including, but not limited to, participation in large-scale demonstrations of alternative energy systems sited in California in cooperation with federal agencies, regional compacts, other state governments, and other participants. For purposes of this subdivision, “participation” shall be defined as any of the following: (1) direct interest in a project; (2) research and development to ensure acceptable resolution of environmental and other impacts of alternative energy systems; (3) research and development to improve siting and permitting methodology for alternative energy systems; (4) experiments using the alternative energy systems; and (5) research and development of appropriate methods to ensure the widespread use of economically useful alternative energy systems.
 Large-scale demonstrations of alternative energy systems are exemplified by the 100KWe to 100MWe range demonstrations of solar, wind, and geothermal systems contemplated by federal agencies, regional compacts, other state governments, and other participants.

(d) Improved methods of construction, design, and operation of facilities to protect against seismic hazards.

(e) Improved methods of energy-demand forecasting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 26.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25602.

The commission shall carry out technical assessment studies on all forms of energy and energy-related problems, in order to influence federal research and development priorities and to be informed on future energy options and their impacts, including, in addition to those problems specified in Section 25601, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Advanced nuclear powerplant concepts, fusion, and fuel cells.

(b) Total energy concepts.

(c) New technology related to coastal and offshore siting of facilities.

(d) Expanded use of wastewater as cooling water and other advances in powerplant cooling.

(e) Improved methods of power transmission to permit interstate and interregional transfer and exchange of bulk electric power.

(f) Measures to reduce wasteful and inefficient uses of energy.

(g) Shifts in transportation modes and changes in transportation technology in relation to implications for energy consumption.

(h) Methods of recycling, extraction, processing, fabricating, handling, or disposing of materials, especially materials which require large commitments of energy.

(i) Expanded recycling of materials and its effect on energy consumption.

(j) Implications of government subsidies and taxation and ratesetting policies.

(k) Utilization of waste heat.

(l) Use of hydrogen as an energy form.

(m) Use of agricultural products, municipal wastes, and organic refuse as an energy source.

Such assessments may also be conducted in order to determine which energy systems among competing technologies are most compatible with standards established pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 25601 by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1081.)
-------------------------------------------

25603.

For research purposes, the commission shall, in cooperation with other state agencies, participate in the design, construction, and operation of energy-conserving buildings using data developed pursuant to Section 25401, in order to demonstrate the economic and technical feasibility of such designs.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 25602 by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1081.)
-------------------------------------------

25605.

On or before November 1, 1978, the commission shall develop and adopt, in cooperation with affected industry and consumer representatives, and after one or more public hearings, regulations governing solar devices. The regulations shall be designed to encourage the development and use of solar energy and to provide maximum information to the public concerning solar devices. The regulations may include, but need not be limited to, any or all of the following:

(a) Standards for testing, inspection, certification, sizing, and installation of solar devices.

(b) Provisions for the enforcement of the standards. Such provisions may include any or all of the following:

(1) Procedures for the accreditation by the commission of laboratories to test and certify solar devices.

(2) Requirements for onsite inspection of solar devices, including specifying methods for inspection, to determine compliance or noncompliance with the standards.

(3) Requirements for submission to the commission of any data resulting from the testing and inspection of solar devices.

(4) Prohibitions on the sale of solar devices that do not meet minimum requirements for safety and durability as established by the commission.

(5) Dissemination of the results of the testing, inspection, and certification program to the public.

(c) In adopting the regulations, the commission shall give due consideration to their effect on the cost of purchasing, installing, operating, and maintaining solar devices. The commission shall reassess the regulations as often as it deems necessary, based on the value of the regulations in terms of benefits and disadvantages to the widespread adoption of solar energy systems and the need to encourage creativity and innovative adaptations of solar energy. The commission may amend or repeal these regulations based on such reassessment.

(d) The commission shall not preclude a person from developing, installing, or operating a solar device on their own property.

(e) A violation of a regulation adopted by the commission pursuant to this section may be enjoined in the same manner as is prescribed in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 25900) for enjoining a violation of
 this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 28.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25605.5.

Standards adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 25605, which are building standards as defined in Section 25488.5, shall be submitted to the State Building Standards Commission for approval pursuant to, and are governed by, the State Building Standards Law (Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18901) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code). Building standards adopted by the commission and published in the State Building Standards Code shall comply with, and be enforced as provided in, Section 25605.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1145, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

25608.

The commission shall confer with officials of federal agencies, including the National Aeronautics and Space Administration, the National Institute of Standards and Technology, the Department of Energy, and the Department of Housing and Urban Development, to coordinate the adoption of regulations pursuant to Sections 25603 and 25605.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1145, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

25609.

The commission may, in adopting regulations pursuant to this chapter, specify the date when the regulations shall take effect. The commission may specify different dates for different regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1081.)
-------------------------------------------

25609.5.

The effective dates of building standards adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 25609 are subject to approval pursuant to the provisions of the State Building Standards Law, Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18901) of Part 13 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

25610.

For purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the commission may contract with any person for materials and services that cannot be performed by its staff or other state agencies, and may apply for federal grants or any other funding.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 25604 by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1081.)
-------------------------------------------

25616.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage local agencies to expeditiously review permit applications to site energy projects, and to encourage energy project developers to consider all cost-effective and environmentally superior alternatives that achieve their project objectives.

(b) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated therefor, the commission shall provide technical assistance and grants-in-aid to assist local agencies to do either or both of the following:

(1) Site energy production or transmission projects which are not otherwise subject to the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section
 25500).

(2) Integrate into their planning processes, and incorporate into their general plans, methods to achieve cost-effective energy efficiency.

(c) The commission shall provide assistance at the request of local agencies.

(d) As used in this section, an energy project is any project designed to produce, convert, or transmit energy as one of its primary functions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 78, Sec. 8.   (AB 2605)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

25617.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to preserve diversity of clean energy resources, including diversity of resources used in electric generation facilities, industrial and commercial applications, and transportation.

(b) The commission shall, within the limits of available funds, provide technical assistance and support for the development of
 zero-emission fuels, zero-emission fueling infrastructure, and zero-emission fuel transportation technologies. That technical assistance and support may include the creation of research, development, and demonstration programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 120, Sec. 1.   (SB 895)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

25618.

(a) The commission shall facilitate development and commercialization of ultra low- and zero-emission electric vehicles and advanced battery technologies, as well as development of an infrastructure to support maintenance and fueling of those vehicles in California. Facilitating commercialization of ultra low- and zero-emission electric vehicles in California shall include, but not be limited to, the following: 

(1) The commission may, in cooperation with county, regional, and city governments, the state’s public and private utilities, and the private business sector, develop plans for accelerating the introduction and use of ultra low- and zero-emission electric vehicles throughout California’s air quality nonattainment areas, and for accelerating the development and implementation of the necessary infrastructure to support the planned use of those vehicles in California. These plans shall be consistent with, but not limited to, the criteria for similar efforts contained in federal loan, grant, or matching fund projects. 

(2) In coordination with other state agencies, the commission shall seek to maximize the state’s use of federal programs, loans, and matching funds available to states for ultra low- and zero-emission electric vehicle development and demonstration programs, and infrastructure development projects. 

(b) Priority for implementing demonstration projects under this section shall be directed toward those areas of the state currently in a nonattainment status with federal and state air quality regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 939, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

25619.

(a) For purposes of this section, “qualified counties” means the Counties of Fresno, Imperial, Inyo, Kern, Kings, Los Angeles, Madera, Merced, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, San Joaquin, San Luis Obispo, Stanislaus, and Tulare.

(b) The commission shall provide up to seven million dollars ($7,000,000) in grants to qualified counties for the development or revision of rules and policies, including, but not limited to, general plan elements, zoning ordinances, and a natural community conservation plan as a plan participant, that facilitate the development of eligible renewable energy resources, and their associated electric transmission facilities, and the
 processing of permits for eligible renewable energy resources. The commission may allocate not more than 1 percent of appropriated funds to provide training to county planning staff to facilitate the siting and permitting of eligible renewable energy resources. A general plan element or zoning ordinance that is adopted or revised pursuant to this section shall be completed within two years of receipt of the grant and shall be consistent with the conservation strategies of any natural community conservation plan if one has been approved, or is under development, pursuant to the Natural Community Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code). For counties within the Desert Renewable Energy Conservation Plan planning area, the commission may award a grant to a county only if the county meets one of the following conditions:

(1) The county is a “plan participant,” as defined by
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (j) of Section 2805 of the Fish and Game Code, in the Desert Renewable Energy Conservation Plan.

(2) The county enters into a memorandum of understanding with the commission in which the county agrees to participate in the development of a natural community conservation plan for the purpose of ensuring that the natural community conservation plan can achieve the goals set forth in the planning agreement entered into pursuant to Section 2810 of the Fish and Game Code, that is dated May 2010, for the preparation of a natural community conservation plan, in a manner that is consistent with the applicable policies of the county.

(c) In its initial round of grant funding, the commission shall establish a preference for a grant to a qualified county in an amount that is adequate to develop a renewable energy element in its general plan that will facilitate
 the development and siting of eligible renewable energy resources that utilize multiple renewable energy technologies. The commission shall also establish a preference for a grant for those counties that have experience in geothermal energy development and have adopted a geothermal element, as defined in Section 25133, to its general plan.

(d) The commission shall only implement this section upon receiving a specific appropriation for the purposes of this section by the Legislature from the Renewable Resources Trust Fund or other funds from the Energy Resources Program Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 601, Sec. 1.   (AB 1255)   Effective September 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.1. Public Interest Energy Research, Demonstration,and Development Program [25620. - 25620.15.]

25620.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is in the best interests of the people of this state that the quality of life of its citizens be improved by providing environmentally sound, safe, reliable, and affordable energy services and products.

(b) To improve the quality of life of this state’s citizens, it is proper and appropriate for the state to undertake public interest energy research, development, and demonstration projects that are not adequately provided for by competitive and regulated energy markets.

(c) Public interest energy research, demonstration, and development projects should advance energy science or technologies of value to California citizens and should be consistent with the policies of this chapter.

(d) It is in the best interest of the people of California for the commission to positively contribute to the overall economic climate of the state within the roles and responsibilities of the commission as defined by statute, regulation, and other official government authority, including, but not limited to, providing economic benefits to California-based entities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 537, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25620.1.

(a) The commission shall develop, implement, and administer the Public Interest Research, Development, and Demonstration Program that is hereby created. The program shall include a full range of research, development, and demonstration activities that, as determined by the commission, are not adequately provided for by competitive and regulated markets. The commission shall administer the program consistent with the policies of this chapter.

(b) The general goal of the program is to develop, and help bring to market, energy technologies that provide increased environmental benefits, greater system reliability, and lower system costs, and that provide tangible benefits to electric utility customers through the following investments:

(1) Advanced transportation technologies that reduce air pollution and greenhouse gas emissions beyond applicable standards, and that benefit electricity and natural gas ratepayers.
